District of Columbia statutes.
47-2843

Repealed

Undertakers’ licenses; qualifications; examination; license without examination; authority of Mayor and Council; appropriations; definitions.

Repealed.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 22(a), 31 DCR 1815
Funeral directors, licensure, qualifications, applications and examinations, see § 3-405.
Mayor, Council and other officers, licensing and registration fees, Mayor’s power to fix, see § 1-301.74.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-2843.

Repeal of regulations: Section 22(b) of D.C. Law 5-84 provided that the rules and regulations governing the licensing of undertakers and apprentice undertakers within the District of Columbia, promulgated March 23, 1954 (c.o. 54-644; 17 DCMR Chapter 23), are repealed.

Board of Funeral Directors and Embalmers abolished: Section 22(c) of D.C. Law 5-84 provided that the Board of Funeral Directors and Embalmers, established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of § 47-2843, is abolished on the date that the final member of the Board of Funeral Directors established under § 3-403 takes office.